utilities/dictionaries/gd_GD-Gaelic.aff
# hunspell affix file for Scottish Gaelic by Kevin Scannell
#
# Copyright 2010 Kevin P. Scannell
#
#    This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
#    it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
#    the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of the License, or
#    (at your option) any later version.
#
#    This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#    but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#    MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#    GNU General Public License for more details.
#
#    You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
#    along with this program; if not, write to the Free Software
#    Foundation, Inc., 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA
#    02110-1301, USA.

SET UTF-8

TRY ahinrdescltogumbàf-AòCìBùèTpGSDMRFPILN'EOUÀéÒÌÙÈHóWVXxQyqÉKwvJÁk
WORDCHARS -'’

# stop split suggestions
NOSPLITSUGS

# replace correct accented double vowels with unaccented ones for acceptance
ICONV 1
ICONV ’ '

# To avoid breaking h- n- t- words
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2

# BREAK 0 does not work (reported as bug), so this is a work-around
# This also causes the - to be seen as part of the word,
# which is necessary to support the optional - in compounded words
BREAK 1
BREAK =

REP 48
REP a à
REP à a
REP á à
REP e è
REP è e
REP é è
REP i ì
REP ì i
REP í ì
REP o ò
REP ò o
REP ó ò
REP u ù
REP ù u
REP ú ù
REP ai ia
REP ia ai
REP ia ìo
REP ìo ia
REP ìa ia
REP ia eu
REP eu ia
REP ìu iù
REP dh gh
REP gh dh
REP dh th
REP th dh
REP bh mh
REP mh bh
REP l ll
REP ll l
REP n nn
REP nn n
REP r rr
REP rr r
REP sc sg
REP sd st
REP sb sp
REP be b'_e
REP bh'a bh'_a
REP chionns chionn_'s
REP fhads fhad_'s
REP fiù's fiù_'s
REP sgàths sgàth_'s
REP sann 's_ann
REP se 's_e
REP th'a th'_a
REP t-strì strì

MAP 5
MAP aáàAÁÀ
MAP eéèEÉÈ
MAP iíìIÍÌ
MAP oóòOÓÒ
MAP uúùUÚÙ

PFX S Y 18
PFX S   b     bh          b[^h]
PFX S   B     Bh          B[^h]
PFX S   c     ch          c[^h]
PFX S   C     Ch          C[^h]
PFX S   d     dh          d[^h]
PFX S   D     Dh          D[^h]
PFX S   f     fh          f[^h]
PFX S   F     Fh          F[^h]
PFX S   g     gh          g[^h]
PFX S   G     Gh          G[^h]
PFX S   m     mh          m[^h]
PFX S   M     Mh          M[^h]
PFX S   p     ph          p[^h]
PFX S   P     Ph          P[^h]
PFX S   s     sh          s[aeiouáéíóúàèìòùlnr]
PFX S   S     Sh          S[aeiouáéíóúàèìòùlnr]
PFX S   t     th          t[^h]
PFX S   T     Th          T[^h]

PFX H Y 1
PFX H   0     h-          [aeiouáéíóúàèìòùAEIOUÁÉÍÓÚÀÈÌÒÙ]

PFX D Y 3
PFX D   0     d'          [aeiouáéíóúàèìòùAEIOUÁÉÍÓÚÀÈÌÒÙ]
PFX D   0     d'          fh
PFX D   f     d'fh        f[^h]

PFX E Y 3
PFX E   0     dh'          [aeiouáéíóúàèìòùAEIOUÁÉÍÓÚÀÈÌÒÙ]
PFX E   0     dh'          fh
PFX E   f     dh'fh        f[^h]

PFX T Y 2
PFX T   0     t-        [aeiouáéíóúàèìòùAEIOUÁÉÍÓÚÀÈÌÒÙ]
PFX T   0     t-        [Ss][aeiouáéíóúàèìòùlnr]

PFX N Y 1
PFX N   0     n-        [aeiouáéíóúàèìòùAEIOUÁÉÍÓÚÀÈÌÒÙ]

SFX K Y 6
SFX K   0     -sa          [^-]
SFX K   0     -se          [^-]
SFX K   0     -ne          [^-]
SFX K   0     -san      [^-]
SFX K   0     eigin     [^e]
SFX K   0     igin     e
#SFX K   0     sa          [^-]
#SFX K   0     se          [^-]
#SFX K   0     ne          [^-]
#SFX K   0     san      [^-]
